Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,134
Secretary of State; powers.

The Secretary of State shall have all powers reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him or her under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 134.